Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4206.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 43527a. (1) Beginning March 1, 2014, only Only an individual holding a valid base license is eligible to purchase a deer license or an antlerless deer license, pursuant to in accordance with current regulations. The Except as otherwise provided in this section, the fee for a deer license or an antlerless deer license is $20.00. An individual who holds a valid base license may obtain 2 antlerless deer licenses each year at no cost. (2) Beginning March 1, 2014, the The department shall charge a nonrefundable application fee not to exceed $5.00 for each individual who applies for an antlerless deer license. (3) The department may issue a kill tag with or as part of each deer license. The kill tag shall must bear the license number. The kill tag may also include space for other pertinent information required by the department. The kill tag, if issued, is part of the license. (4) Where authorized by the department, a resident may purchase a second deer license for the fee assessed under this subsection for the deer license for which that individual is eligible. However, a senior license discount is not available for the purchase of a second deer license. Where authorized by the department, a nonresident may purchase an additional deer license or antlerless deer license under this section for $170.00. The department may issue orders under part 401 designating the kind of deer that may be taken and the geographic area in which any license issued under this section is valid, when advisable in managing deer.